enhuige.foma
define HarmRuleIgee §igee§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                    §igee§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ,,
                    §igee§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ;
define HarmRuleIgeija1 §igeija1§ -> i // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                     §igeija1§ -> %$ a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* [ s z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> %$ a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* [ z s ] %^ _   .o.
                     §igeija1§ -> j a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ Consnosz ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> s a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> z a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> j a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* [ Consnosz ]+ %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* [ s s | z z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> s a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija1§ -> z a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* z %^ _   .o.
                      z -> s  || [ s | S ] _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || [ s | S ] s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleIgeija2 §igeija2§ -> i // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                     §igeija2§ -> %$ a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* [ s z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> %$ a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* [ z s ] %^ _   .o.
                     §igeija2§ -> j a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ Consnoszk ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> s a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> z a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> j a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* [ Consnoszk ]+ %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* [ s s | z z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> s a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igeija2§ -> z a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* z %^ _   .o.
                      z -> s  || [ s | S ] _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || [ s | S ] s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleIgejatokitek1 §igejatokitek1§ -> i t e k // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ,,
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> %$ á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ s z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> %$ á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ z s ]  %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ s s | z z | S S | Z Z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> s á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> z á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> j á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel* "^" ?* Consnosz+ %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Cons* [ s s | z z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> s á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Cons* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> z á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Cons* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek1§ -> j á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Cons* Consnosz+ %^ _   .o.
                     z -> s  || [ s | S ] _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || [ s | S ] s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || [ z | Z ] _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || [ z | Z ] z %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleIgejakik1 §igejakik1§ -> i k // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                     §igejakik1§ -> %$ á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel* [ s z ] %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> %$ á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel* [ z s ] %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> z á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ Consnosz ]+ %^  _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* [ s s | z z ] %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* s %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> z á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* z  %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik1§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* [ Consnosz ]+ %^  _  .o. 
                     z -> s  || s _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || s s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleIgejatokitek2 §igejatokitek2§ -> i t e k // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ,,
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> %$ á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ s z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> %$ á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ z s ]  %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ s s | z z | S S | Z Z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> s á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> z á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> j á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel* "^" ?* Consnoszk+ %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Consk* [ s s | z z ] %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> s á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Consk* s %^ _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> z á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Consk* z %^  _   .o. 
                     §igejatokitek2§ -> j á t o k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel   Consk* Consnoszk+ %^ _   .o.
                     z -> s  || [ s | S ] _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || [ s | S ] s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || [ z | Z ] _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || [ z | Z ] z %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleIgejakik2 §igejakik2§ -> i k // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                     §igejakik2§ -> %$ á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel* [ s z ] %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> %$ á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel* [ z s ] %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* s %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> z á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* z %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* [ Consnoszk ]+ %^  _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* [ s s | z z ] %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* s %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> z á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* z  %^ _  .o. 
                     §igejakik2§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Consk* [ Consnoszk ]+ %^  _  .o. 
                     z -> s  || s _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> z  || s s %^ _ .o.
                     s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                     %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleIgetem §t1§ -> i k // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ,,
                     §t1§ -> s á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  s  "^" ?* _    ,, 
                     §t1§ -> j á k // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \s* "^" ?* _    ; 
#bocsát, lát, fut       
define HarmRulesj    §sj§ -> 0 // d %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj§ -> s // [ ű | í | Ű | Í | [ Cons %^ ] | Cons ] t %^ _ .o.
                     §sj§ -> s // [ Vowel s ] %^ _ .o.
                     §sj§ -> %! // [ \ű & \í & \[ Cons %^ ] & \Cons ] t %^ _  Cons  .o.
                     §sj§ -> %$ // [ \ű & \í & \[ Cons %^ ] & \Cons ] t %^ _ [ 0 | Vowel ] .o.
                     §sj§ -> 0 // [ \s & \d ] z %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj§ -> z // [ \s & \d ] z %^ _ \d* .o.
                     §sj§ -> %( // s z %^ _ .o.
                     §sj§ -> %) // d z %^ _ .o.
                     §sj§ -> j  // \t %^ _ .o.
                     t %^ %$ -> s s %^ .o.
                     t %^ %! ->  s %^ .o.
                     s z %^ %( -> s s z .o.
                     d z %^ %) -> d d z ;
define HarmRulesj1   §sj1§ -> %( // [ s z t ] %^ _ Cons .o.
                     §sj1§ -> %$ // [ s z t ] %^ _ [ \Cons | 0 ] .o.
                     §sj1§ -> j  // \[ s z t ] %^ _ .o.
                     s z t %^ %$ -> s s z %^ .o.
                     s z t %^ %( -> s z %^ ;
define HarmRulesj2   §sj2§ -> s // [ Cons t ] %^ _ .o.
                     §sj2§ -> j  // \[ Cons t ] %^ _ ;
#tát
define HarmRulesj3    §sj3§ -> 0 // d %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj3§ -> s // [ á | ű | í | [ Cons %^ ] | Cons ] t %^ _ .o.
                     §sj3§ -> %! // [ \á & \ű & \í & \[ Cons %^ ] & \Cons ] t %^ _  Cons  .o.
                     §sj3§ -> %$ // [ \á & \ű & \í & \[ Cons %^ ] & \Cons ] t %^ _ [ 0 | Vowel ] .o.
                     §sj3§ -> 0 // \s z %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj3§ -> z // \s z %^ _ \d* .o.
                     §sj3§ -> %( // s z %^ _ .o.
                     §sj3§ -> j  // \t %^ _ .o.
                     t %^ %$ -> s s %^ .o.
                     t %^ %! ->  s %^ .o.
                     s z %^ %( -> s s z ;
#fest
define HarmRulesj4    §sj4§ -> 0 // d %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj4§ -> %- // [ ű | í | [ Cons %^ ] | Cons ] t %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj4§ -> %+ // [ ű | í | [ Cons %^ ] | Cons ] t %^ _ [ \d |
0 ].o.
                     §sj4§ -> %! // [ \ű & \í & \[ Cons %^ ] & \Cons ] t %^ _ 
Cons  .o.
                     §sj4§ -> %$ // [ \ű & \í & \[ Cons %^ ] & \Cons ] t %^ _ [
0 | Vowel ] .o.
                     §sj4§ -> 0 // \s z %^ _ d .o.
                     §sj4§ -> z // \s z %^ _ \d* .o.
                     §sj4§ -> %( // s z %^ _ .o.
                     §sj4§ -> j  // \t %^ _ .o.
                     t %^ %$ -> s s %^ .o.
                     t %^ %+ ->  s %^ .o.
                     t %^ %- ->  0 %^ .o.
                     t %^ %! ->  s %^ .o.
                     s z %^ %( -> s s z ;
define HarmRuleess   §ess§ -> s //  [ t | s | T | S ] %^ _  .o.
                     §ess§ -> 0 //  [ \t & \s ] %^ _  ;
# j,l,n,r után t, többi után ett, ott, ött
define HarmRuleIgetattet §igetattet§ ->  0 // .#. \"^"* ?* Vowel [ n y ] "^" _ .o.
                     §igetattet§ ->  e t // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  e t // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  ö t // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  ö t // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  0 // .#. \"^"* ?* Consjlnr "^" _  ,,
                     §igetattet§ ->  0 // .#. \"^"* ?* Vowel "^" _  ;
define HarmRuleIgetattetoe §igetattetoe§ ->  0 // .#. \"^"* ?* Vowel [ n y ] "^" _ .o.
                     §igetattetoe§ ->  e t // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattetoe§ ->  e t // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattetoe§ ->  e t // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
                     §igetattetoe§ ->  e t // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* \Consjlnr "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattetoe§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \Consjlnr %^ _   ,,
